Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 6

General Powers of Banks

45-2-601. General powers.

Subject to regulation by the commissioner and any restrictions expressly imposed by this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, any bank may enjoy any and all rights and may exercise any and all powers, as defined herein, conferred upon banking corporations for profit by the Tennessee Business Corporation Act, compiled in title 48, chapters 11-27, as same may be amended from time to time. In addition, any state bank may exercise any power or engage in any activity that it could exercise or engage in if it were a national bank located in Tennessee, subject to regulation by the commissioner for the purpose of maintaining the state bank's safety and soundness.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.101); 1973, ch. 294 § 6; 1977, ch. 274, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-401; Acts 1986, ch. 666, § 1; 1994, ch. 551, § 19.

Cross-References. Common trust funds, establishing for purpose of furnishing investments to itself as fiduciary, §35-4-102.

Cooperative scholarship corporations, banks participating in plan, §49-4-106.

Development credit corporations, §48-101-101 et seq.

Loans and investments utilizing federal housing administration, Federal National Mortgage Association and veterans' administration authorized, §35-3-120.

Negotiable instruments, title 47, ch. 3.

Tennessee Valley Authority, investment in bonds and obligations of, §35-3-119.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, §§ 29, 51.

Law Reviews.

The Competitive Equality Doctrine and the Demise of Intrastate Bank Branching Restrictions (Henry N. Butler), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 703 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Both former T.C.A. §56-6-201 (repealed), prohibiting a bank holding company from owning or controlling an insurance agent, and T.C.A. §56-35-131(a)(1), limiting the amount of business income a title insurance agent may receive through owners and affiliates, are preempted by federal law, including the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Financial Modernization Act (GLB), P.L. 106-102, to the extent these statutes prohibit or significantly interfere with a national bank's exercise of its authority to control or own an interest in a title insurance agency; under the state “wild-card” statute, T.C.A. §45-2-601, then, state banks may also control or own a financial subsidiary that acts as a title insurance agent under the same conditions national banks would be permitted to engage in the same activity, OAG 02-013, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/1/02).

Effect of regulations issued by the comptroller of the currency, OAG 04-057, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (4/06/04).

Effect of regulations issued by the comptroller of the currency, OAG 04-059, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (4/07/04).

45-2-602. Subsidiary corporations.

Any bank may exercise any of its powers through the medium of a subsidiary corporation or corporations. Any and all rights conferred upon banks shall be fully applicable to the subsidiary corporations of banks. Banks shall not be permitted, however, through the use of subsidiary corporations to circumvent the restrictions imposed by § 45-2-614. Whenever the commissioner deems it necessary, the commissioner may examine any corporation that is a subsidiary corporation of a state bank.

A bank may organize, participate in or own an ownership interest in a limited liability company, or limited liability partnership, under this section and this title.

For the purposes of this section, a minority stock ownership interest in a credit insurance company whose capital meets or exceeds the requirements of § 56-2-114, or in an insurance holding company system as defined in § 56-11-101, whose principal business is conducted through one (1) or more credit insurance companies whose capital meets or exceeds the requirements of § 56-2-114, shall be deemed to be a subsidiary; provided, that the original cost of the stock ownership interest does not exceed five percent (5%) of the capital and surplus of the bank; and provided further, that no one (1) bank shall own more than five percent (5%) of the stock in the credit insurance company or insurance holding company system.

The existence and operation of any subsidiary corporation formed prior to June 9, 1981, shall not be impaired by subdivision (b)(1).

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.102); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-402; Acts 1981, ch. 253, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 768, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

45-2-603. Emergency powers.

In the event of an emergency resulting from fire, act of God, attack by a foreign nation, riot, insurrection, civil disorder or any similar disaster, any bank, without regard to any restrictions imposed by this chapter and chapter 1 of this title, may take any action that it deems necessary to preserve its assets and protect the interests of its depositors, shareholders or employees including, but not restricted to, suspending business activity or obtaining the benefit of, or participating in, emergency action authorized by the government of the United States, or the state of Tennessee or its political subdivisions.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.103); T.C.A., § 45-403.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bailments, § 3.

45-2-604. Hours of operation — Days closed — Effect on transactions.

A bank shall establish hours of operation it deems necessary or appropriate; provided, that a bank may not be closed for more than two (2) consecutive calendar days without the prior approval of the commissioner, except a bank, without prior approval, may be closed Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays and during emergencies as provided in § 45-2-603.

Nothing in any law of this state shall in any manner whatsoever affect the validity of, or render void or voidable, the payment, certification, or acceptance of a check or other negotiable instrument or any other transaction by a bank because it was done or performed during any time other than regular banking hours; provided, that nothing herein shall be construed to compel any bank that by law or custom is entitled to close or suspend business for the whole or any part of any day to keep open for the transaction of business, or to perform any of the acts or transactions aforementioned, on any optional closing day or legal holiday, except at its own option.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.202); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-405; Acts 1996, ch. 768, § 18.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Cross-References. Holidays, title 15.

45-2-605. Transmitting money — Dealing in foreign exchange.

A bank may accept money for transmission and may transmit money.

A bank may buy and sell foreign exchange to the extent necessary to meet the needs of customers.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.210); T.C.A., § 45-413.

45-2-606. Depositories.

Any bank may, for the convenience of its customers, provide suitable receptacles on, in, or as a part of the bank premises for the deposit of money, checks and other property, and may contract with its customers, through display of appropriate notice upon the receptacles or by written notice to its customers, that the receptacles are instrumentalities of the customer and that money, checks or other property placed in them shall not be considered to be deposited with the bank until received by an employee or officer of the bank. The receptacle shall not be placed in or located on, in or about any premises where the bank cannot legally carry on the business of banking.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.211); T.C.A., § 45-414.

45-2-607. Investments.

Investments by state banks shall be limited to:

Obligations that satisfy the requirements of this chapter and chapter 1 of this title for loans;

Obligations of the United States, a state of the United States or the Dominion of Canada;

Obligations of the International Bank for Reconstruction and Redevelopment or the African Development Bank;

Obligations of a territory of the United States, a province of the Dominion of Canada, a subdivision or instrumentality of a state or territory of the United States, an authority organized under state law, an interstate compact or by substantially identical legislation adopted by two (2) or more states;

Obligations of a corporation chartered by the United States or a state thereof doing business in the United States;

The stock of one (1) or more banks or corporations chartered or incorporated under the laws of the United States, or of any state of the United States, and principally engaged in international or foreign banking, or banking in a dependency or insular possession of the United States, either directly or through the agency, ownership or control of local institutions in foreign countries, or in the dependencies or insular possessions, including the stock of one (1) or more banks or corporations chartered or incorporated under § 25a of the Federal Reserve Act, as approved December 24, 1919. Any state bank shall have the power to acquire and hold directly or indirectly stock or other evidences of ownership in one (1) or more banks organized under the law of a foreign country or dependency or insular possession of the United States and not engaged directly or indirectly in any activity in the United States, except that which is incidental to the international and foreign business of the foreign bank and to make loans or extension of credit to or for the account of the bank. Investments in the stock of banks or corporations under this subdivision (a)(6) shall not exceed in the aggregate ten percent (10%) of the state bank's paid-in capital stock and surplus;

The capital stock of joint stock land banks for carrying on the business of lending money on farm mortgage security created and organized under the act of congress of the United States, approved July 17, 1916, and known as the Federal Farm Loan Act. Any bank, firm, person, or corporation doing a banking business may invest its funds and accumulations in stocks, notes, bonds, debentures, or other obligations issued under the act of congress of the United States entitled the Federal Home Loan Bank Act approved July 22, 1932, and in notes, bonds, debentures, or other obligations issued under title IV of the act of congress of the United States entitled the National Housing Act, approved June 27, 1934;

Stock, debentures, and other obligations of national mortgage associations or similar institutions now or hereafter organized under title III of the National Housing Act, to the same extent as national banks are now or hereafter permitted to invest in the stock and/or obligations;

Real property to the extent that the total depreciated value thereof does not exceed the capital and surplus of the bank;

Personal property acquired for lease to customers;

The stock of any other bank located in this state; provided, that the investment in the stock of all the banks shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the capital, surplus, and undivided profits of the investing bank; and provided further, that if the stock is voting stock, the investment shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the total of the voting stock. The investment shall be made only upon thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the commissioner of financial institutions, and any investment that is consummated without giving notice shall be void. The commissioner shall have the right to disapprove the investment if the commissioner finds that the investment does not conform with the standards set forth in §§ 45-1-102 and 45-1-107, and gives written notice detailing the reasons for disapproval on or before the end of the thirty-day period. If the commissioner disapproves the transaction, the bank shall have a right to a hearing before the commissioner under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. This investment shall be in addition to the right of any bank to invest in the stock of a banker's bank otherwise permitted under this section;

Adjustable rate preferred stock of any publicly held corporation created or existing under the laws of the United States or any state, district, or territory of the United States that is rated in one (1) of the four (4) highest investment grades by one (1) or more recognized investment rating services approved by the commissioner for rating the investments. The bank's investment in adjustable rate preferred stock shall be permitted to the same extent the investments are permitted to national banks domiciled in Tennessee, subject to regulation by the commissioner for the purpose of maintaining the state bank's safety and soundness;

Shares or certificates in any open-end management investment company that is registered with the securities and exchange commission under the Investment Company Act of 1940, and the portfolio of which is restricted by the management company's investment policy, changeable only if authorized by shareholder vote, solely to any investments in which a bank by law or regulation may invest;

The bank's investment in the shares or certificates of the open-end investment companies shall be permitted to the same extent the investments are permitted to national banks domiciled in Tennessee, subject to limiting regulations promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, for the purpose of safety and soundness;

Other investments that are authorized national banks or member banks of the federal reserve system;

Subject to regulations promulgated by the commissioner for the purpose of maintaining the state bank's safety and soundness, a bank may invest in a Tennessee business and industrial development corporation (BIDCO) as provided in § 45-8-203; provided, that the investment in the stock of the BIDCO shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of the capital, surplus, and undivided profits of the investing bank. The investment shall be made only upon thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the commissioner and an investment that is consummated without giving notice shall be void. The commissioner shall have the right to disapprove the investment if the commissioner finds that the investment does not conform to the standards set forth in §§ 45-1-102 and 45-1-107 and gives written notice detailing the reasons for the disapproval on or before the end of the thirty-day period. If the commissioner disapproves the transaction, the bank shall have a right to a hearing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. This investment shall be in addition to the right of any bank to invest in the stock of a bankers' bank, otherwise permitted under this section and in the stock of any other bank located in Tennessee, otherwise permitted by this section; and

Stock, debentures, and other obligations of community development corporations subject to the rules the commissioner may prescribe.

Any investment in property that is not authorized by subsection (a) may be acquired by any state bank to satisfy or protect a loan previously made in good faith and in the ordinary course of business. Property acquired in satisfaction of a loan shall be held subject to the following limitations:

All property except real property shall be sold within six (6) months or such additional period as the commissioner may allow; and

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B), real property shall be sold within ten (10) years;

If the bank holds the real property for a period longer than five (5) years, then after an initial five-year period, the bank, in reporting its financial status to the department, shall write off twenty percent (20%) of the appraised value of the real property each subsequent year it is held until the real property is either sold or the ten-year period has elapsed. Upon application of the bank, the commissioner may, in extraordinary circumstances, adjust or waive the percentage a bank shall write off the real property each year, may extend the period in which the real property may be held beyond ten (10) years, or any combination of the foregoing. If the commissioner reduces, waives, or adjusts the amount of write-off, the real property may not be carried at more than the appraised value of the property;

Real property which has been written off but not disposed of shall be maintained on the bank's books at some nominal value;

If the bank's board of directors deems the real property owned to be a prudent investment for income or appreciation for the bank, the board may take action to maintain the real property on the bank's books as an investment, pursuant to subdivision (a)(9);

Not more than one hundred twenty (120) days before or thirty (30) days after the date the parcel is acquired by the bank as real property owned, or from the date on which the bank legally acquires the real property for investment purposes, the bank shall obtain from an independent, qualified appraiser an appraisal of the parcel; provided, however, that:

For parcels whose book value is two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) or less, the bank may obtain an evaluation in lieu of an appraisal; and

For parcels whose book value is one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less, no appraisal or evaluation shall be required; and

Within twelve (12) months from the date the bank acquires the real property, and every twelve (12) months thereafter for as long as the bank owns the real property, the bank shall obtain another appraisal or evaluation, whichever is appropriate as provided for in subdivision (b)(2)(E).

As used in this section, “investment” means the purchase of any interest in any property of any nature principally for the purpose of deriving profit from changes in the value of the property or from dividends, interest or rent thereon, as distinguished from the purpose of using the property in the conduct of the business of a bank. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the investment by a bank or trust company in one (1) or more subsidiaries, or the underwriting of or dealing in certificates of deposit, bankers' acceptances or those securities that are permissible investments for a bank under subdivisions (a)(1)-(14), shall not constitute an investment within the meaning of this section.

In addition to the other provisions of this section, upon thirty (30) days' prior written notice to the commissioner, providing such detail as the commissioner may require, a bank may invest, in the aggregate, up to seventy-five percent (75%) of its unimpaired capital, surplus and undivided profits in the stock or purchase the assets of other corporations, firms, partnerships or companies, including limited liability corporations and limited liability partnerships, which are or will be:

Primarily engaging in activities permissible for federally chartered financial institutions, their authorized subsidiaries or bank holding companies under applicable laws, rules, regulations or orders;

Primarily engaging in activities of a financial nature, including, but not limited to, the transmission or processing of information, data or payments relating to the activities, all forms of securities activities not otherwise authorized, together with other activities that the commissioner shall determine and that may be permissible for other bank and non-bank financial institutions chartered by Tennessee or other states by regulation or order; or

Engaging in any other activities approved by the commissioner.

Unless denied by the commissioner within thirty (30) days following receipt of the written notice or upon approval prior to the expiration of the thirty (30) days, a bank may complete its investment in the stock or purchase the assets of the other corporation, firm, partnership or company, or commence a new activity through an existing subsidiary. The commissioner may extend the thirty-day period for approval or denial, for an additional thirty-day period, by notifying the applicant if the commissioner determines that the proposed investment or activity raises issues that require additional information or additional time for analysis.

The commissioner shall monitor the impact of activities and investments of banks approved under this section on the safety and soundness of the banks. Any stocks owned or hereafter acquired in excess of the limitations herein imposed shall be disposed of at public or private sale within six (6) months after the date of acquiring the stocks, and if not so disposed of, they shall be charged to profit and loss account, and no longer carried on the books as an asset. The limit of time in which the stocks shall be disposed of or charged off the books of the bank may be extended by the commissioner if, in the commissioner's judgment, it is for the best interest of the bank that the extension be granted.

The commissioner may, as a condition of approving an investment under this section, impose limits on the loans that each bank can make to the corporation, firm or partnership.

The commissioner shall maintain a public file, available for inspection at the department's offices, which shall contain a summary or synopsis of any application submitted under this subsection (d). The summary shall include only the name of the institution applying, the proposed activity and the decision of the commissioner.

Any state or national bank or subsidiary that engages in an activity that subjects it to licensure and/or regulation under other than title 45, chapter 2, shall be subject to licensure and/or regulation on a basis that does not discriminate by the appropriate regulatory agency that licenses and/or regulates non-banks that engage in the same activity.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.242); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-436; Acts 1983, ch. 74, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1983, ch. 216, §§ 1-9; Acts 1986, ch. 602, § 1; 1987, ch. 86, §§ 1, 2; 1988, ch. 819, § 1; 1989, ch. 124, § 25; 1989, ch. 150, § 1; 1989, ch. 168, § 2; 1994, ch. 551, §§ 11, 12; 1996, ch. 768, § 19; 2013, ch. 233, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 25a of the Federal Reserve Act, referred to in this section, is found in 12 U.S.C. §§ 611-631. The Federal Home Loan Bank Act is compiled throughout 12, 15 and 18. U.S.C. title III of the National Housing Act is found in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1716 and note, 1717-1723c, and title IV of the National Housing Act is found in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1721-1730. The Investment Company Act of 1940, referred to in this section, is compiled in 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq.

Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Acts 2013, ch. 233, § 2 provided that the department of financial institutions is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, or to issue departmental bulletins in lieu of such regulations, to implement the provisions of the act, which amended subdivision (b)(2).

Cross-References. Applicability to industrial banks, §45-5-607.

Investing in obligations of public housing authority authorized, §35-3-115.

Investment in obligations of federal housing administration, Federal National Mortgage Association and veterans' administration authorized, §35-3-120.

Law Reviews.

State Regulation of Bank Holding Companies and the Future of Interstate Banking: A Tennessee Perspective (Colman B. Hoffman and Kathryn R. Edge), 51 Tenn. L. Rev. 383 (1984).

Attorney General Opinions. The general assembly did not intend to prohibit the department of commerce and insurance from enforcing the restrictions on bank holding company ownership of a title insurance agency or conditions on continued licensure of a title insurance agent, OAG 02-013, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/1/02).

The administrative entity or person charged with interpreting and determining whether an agency has engaged in the type of discrimination prohibited by T.C.A. §45-2-607(d)(6) is the one charged by T.C.A. §45-2-607(d)(6) to license and/or regulate any state or national bank or subsidiary on a basis that does not discriminate within the meaning of that subdivision, OAG 02-013, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/1/02).

A limited liability corporation with 15 members with equal ownership, each of which is a state or national bank, is not a subsidiary of a state or national bank within the meaning of T.C.A. §45-2-607(d), OAG 02-013, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 12 (2/1/02).

45-2-608. Acceptances.

A bank may accept:

A draft that has not more than six (6) months' sight to run, exclusive of days of grace, and is drawn to finance the purchase of goods with maturity in accordance with the original terms of purchase, or is secured by shipping documents transferring or securing title to goods or by receipt of a licensed or bonded warehouse or elevator transferring or securing title to readily marketable, nonperishable staples; and

A draft that has no more than three (3) months' sight to run, exclusive of days of grace, and is drawn by a bank outside the continental limits of the United States for the purpose of furnishing dollar exchange for trade.

A bank may issue a letter of credit, but unless the authority conferred to draw upon the bank or its correspondents is limited to the drafts that a bank is authorized by this section to accept, the amount of the credit outstanding at any one time shall be deemed to be a loan to the person for whose account the credit was issued.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.243); T.C.A., § 45-437.

45-2-609. Sale of assets in ordinary course.

A bank may sell any asset in the ordinary course of business, but the sale of all or substantially all of the assets of a bank shall entitle dissenting shareholders to the rights provided by §45-2-1309.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.244); T.C.A., § 45-438.

45-2-610. Borrowing.

Any bank may borrow money and issue evidence of indebtedness for a loan.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.245); T.C.A., § 45-439.

45-2-611. Pledge of assets.

A bank may pledge its assets only:

To enable it to act as an agent for the sale of obligations of the United States;

To secure borrowed funds;

To secure the public funds of a governmental entity; and

For other purposes that are approved by the commissioner.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Governmental entity” means:

The United States government or any agency thereof; or

Any instrumentality of the United States the funds of which are required by law to be secured; and

The state of Tennessee or any other state, counties, incorporated municipalities and their political subdivisions or any utility district organized under the laws of a state or an interstate compact; and

“Public funds” means:

Funds in which the entire beneficial interest is owned by a governmental entity; or

Funds held in the name of a public official charged with the duty to receive or administer funds and acting in the person's official capacity.

A financial institution authorized to secure public funds of any governmental entity shall do so in the same manner and under the same conditions as state deposits under title 9, chapter 4, or as provided in a collateral pool as provided in title 9, chapter 4, part 5.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.246); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; T.C.A., § 45-440; Acts 1990, ch. 1043, § 3.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 32.

Attorney General Opinions. Rural cooperative not a utility district, OAG 96-108, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 133 (8/30/96).

45-2-612. Endorsement and signature guaranty.

Any bank may assume secondary liability as an endorser of a negotiable or nonnegotiable instrument that it owns or has received for collection or that of the guarantor of the genuineness of a signature.

A bank may disclaim all or any part of the foregoing obligation in its guaranty; however, nothing in this section shall conflict with the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, and the Uniform Commercial Code shall govern.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.247); T.C.A., § 45-441.

45-2-613. Exchange charges.

Banks, both state and national, have the right to make an exchange charge for the handling of cash items, and when the cash items are presented to the payer bank for payment through or by any bank, banker, trust company, federal reserve bank, post office, express company, collection agency, or by any other agency whatever, the amount of the charge shall not exceed one-tenth of one percent (.1%) of the total amount of the cash item, so presented and paid at one (1) time, and the minimum charge shall be ten cents (10¢); provided, that the charge shall not be made on checks or drafts given or drawn in settlement of obligations due the state or any subdivision of the state, or of the United States, and that the charge may not be made by banks for the collection of checks deposited with the banks, when the check is drawn on any other bank in the same municipality, city, town or village; and provided further, that nothing in this section shall be deemed mandatory upon the banks to charge exchange on checks or drafts payable to a person in this state, and drawn on a bank, trust company, or persons within or without this state, but it shall be optional with the banks whether they shall so charge exchange.

No officer shall protest for nonpayment the cash item when the nonpayment is solely on account of the failure or refusal of any of the agencies to pay the exchange, and there shall be no right of action, either at law or in equity, against any bank in this state for a refusal to pay the cash item when the refusal is based alone on the ground of the nonpayment of the exchange.

If, by any law, rule, regulation or court decision, the national banks in this state are not permitted to charge and collect the exchange, subsections (a) and (b) shall remain in full force and effect as to all other banks in this state; and in the event of the holding by the courts, or the refusal of any national bank in this state to comply with the sections, it shall be optional with state banks located in the same municipality with national banks or state banks that are members of the federal reserve system as to whether the charge shall be made.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.248); T.C.A., § 45-442.

45-2-614. Branch banking.

Any Tennessee-chartered bank may establish or otherwise acquire and maintain branch offices, branch banks and other branch facilities for the conduct of its banking business at any location in Tennessee and, except as may be prohibited by applicable law of other jurisdictions, at any other location.

No branch, branch office or other facility at which deposits may be accepted shall be established until approved by the commissioner. Notwithstanding the above, the commissioner shall provide by regulation that a bank with a regulatory rating of 1 or 2 may, in lieu of an application, file a written notification for a branch office with the commissioner providing the information as the commissioner may require, including, but not limited to, proof of public notice. Unless objected to by the commissioner with a request for additional information, the notice shall be deemed sufficient and approved at the expiration of the public notice comment period as established by regulation. For an application from any other bank, the application shall be deemed to have been approved by the commissioner unless disapproved within ninety (90) calendar days after the submission of the application. In the event the notification or application to open a branch bank is disapproved and the bank feels aggrieved, the bank may petition for a review by certiorari as provided in title 27, chapter 9. For purposes of this subsection (b), “regulatory rating” means a confidential regulatory rating established, assigned or accepted, pursuant to agreement with a federal regulatory agency, by the department to assess the condition of the bank. The rating shall at all times remain confidential.

Any other laws to the contrary notwithstanding, any branch bank presently located in any county may be incorporated as a bank, with all of the rights and powers granted to a bank under this title, and without restriction on the acquisition or ownership of its stock by a bank holding company, as defined in the Federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, that owns controlling interest in the principal bank. The commissioner shall grant a charter and forthwith issue a certificate of authority to the bank if the charter is in the form prescribed by § 45-2-204, the proposed officers and directors are qualified under § 45-2-205, the proposed capital structure is adequate under § 45-2-207 and the conditions of § 45-2-214 have been satisfied, other requirements of this title relative to the initial organization of a bank not being applicable.

A branch office, branch bank, or other branch facility shall not be established or acquired in Tennessee by any bank, except:

A Tennessee-charted bank;

A national bank that has its main office located in this state;

A bank that merges or consolidates with a bank described in subdivision (d)(1)(A) or (d)(1)(B); or

An out-of-state bank that acquires a branch in accordance with § 45-2-1412.(2) Subdivision (d)(1) shall not be construed to prohibit the surviving or resulting bank following a merger or consolidation referenced in subdivision (d)(1)(C) or the out-of-state bank acquiring a branch referenced in subdivision (d)(1)(D) from establishing and acquiring additional branch offices, branch banks, and other branch facilities in this state.

No Tennessee bank or branch office or facility of a Tennessee bank that conducts the following transactions as an agent on behalf of another Tennessee bank, whether or not the Tennessee banks are affiliated through common control or otherwise, and no bank that is a subsidiary of a bank holding company or branch office or facility of a bank holding company that conducts the following transaction on behalf of another bank that is a subsidiary of the same bank holding company, shall be deemed a branch of the principal bank: receipt of deposits, renewal of time deposits, closing of loans, servicing of loans, and receipt of payments on loans and other obligations. The commissioner may establish by rule additional types of agency transactions, the performance of which shall not cause the agent bank to be deemed a branch of the principal bank. With respect to the agency relationships to which a Tennessee-chartered bank is to be a party, the commissioner may establish rules requiring receipt of notification, or approval, by the commissioner before the agency transactions are conducted. For the purposes of this subsection (e), “Tennessee bank” and “bank holding company” have the meanings set forth in § 45-2-1402.

Acts 1969, ch. 36, § 1 (3.249); 1973, ch. 294, § 6; 1974, ch. 463, § 1; 1977, ch. 172, § 1; T.C.A., § 45-443; Acts 1980, ch. 510, § 6; 1984, ch. 570, § 1; 1985, ch. 165, § 1; 1987, ch. 119, § 1; 1989, ch. 85, § 1; 1990, ch. 644, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 165, §§ 3, 4; 1996, ch. 768, §§ 20, 21; 1998, ch. 742, § 3; 2001, ch. 54, §§ 14, 15.

Compiler's Notes. The Federal Bank Holding Company Act of 1956, as amended, is compiled in 12 U.S.C. §§ 1841-1849.

Acts 1995, ch. 165, § 6 provided that nothing in that act shall be deemed or construed as to: (i) authorize or permit, prior to June 1, 1997, merger or consolidation of any bank having its home state, as defined in §45-2-1402, in Tennessee with or into any bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee; or (ii) authorize or permit, whether before, on, or after June 1, 1997, a bank which does not have its home state in Tennessee to establish or acquire a branch in Tennessee by any means other than merger or consolidation, on or after June 1, 1997, of such bank with or into a bank having its home state in Tennessee.

Acts 1996, ch. 768, which amended this section, is known and may be cited as the Bank Reform Act of 1996.

Cross-References. Acquisition of bank shares by holding company not a violation of this section, §45-2-1404.

Branch banks, exception for national or state bank resulting from merger or conversion, §§45-2-1302,45-2-1303.

Merger of financially troubled bank permissible notwithstanding this section, §45-2-1313.

Trust officers, §45-2-1009.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Banks and Banking, § 65.

Law Reviews.

The Competitive Equality Doctrine and the Demise of Intrastate Bank Branching Restrictions (Henry N. Butler), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 703 (1989).